Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 2 Deer

Cross references.

Permits to kill deer causing damage to crops, §

27-2-18

.

27-3-40.
Required clothing.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt deer or for any person to accompany another person hunting deer during the firearms deer season unless each person shall wear a total of at least 500 square inches of daylight fluorescent orange material as an outer garment. Such clothing must be worn above the waistline and may include a head covering.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 711, § 1; Code 1933, § 45-517, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-41.
Unsupervised hunting by persons under 12 years of age.

It shall be unlawful for any person who is under 12 years of age to hunt any wildlife in this state unless such person is under the direct supervision of an adult during the period in which such person is hunting.

It shall be unlawful for any person to cause or knowingly permit such person’s child or ward who is less than 12 years of age to hunt any wildlife with a weapon in this state unless such child or ward is under adult supervision.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 16A; Code 1933, § 45-518, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 779, § 3.

27-3-42.
Taking of deer in lake, stream, or pond.

It shall be unlawful to take any deer by any means while the deer is in any lake, stream, or pond.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-519, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-43.
Removal of head of deer.

It shall be unlawful to remove the head of any deer until the carcass is processed or surrendered to a storage facility for processing or storage.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-520, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.

27-3-44.
Killing of deer which have no antlers visible.

It shall be unlawful to kill any deer in this state unless the deer has antlers (bone) visible above the hair, provided that the board may by regulation authorize an antlerless or either-sex season or hunt in accordance with sound wildlife management practices.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-521, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 530, §§ 1, 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 835, §§ 2, 5.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1987, p. 530, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that prosecutions of offenses under this Code section which are pending on April 1, 1987, shall not be abated as a result of the amendment of this Code section by that Act.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 835, § 4, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “It is the intention of the General Assembly that prosecutions of offenses under Code Section 27-3-44 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated which are pending on the date this Act becomes effective shall not be abated as a result of the amendment to that Code section accomplished by this Act.” This Act became effective April 1, 1988.

27-3-45.
[Reserved] Information required before removal of carcass from place of killing; exception for certain managed hunts; using multiple sets of licenses or license card carriers.

History.

Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2863, § 7; Ga. L. 1995, p. 946, § 8; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1056, § 3/SB 112, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1056, § 3/SB 112 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2015.

27-3-46.
[Reserved] Failure to affix deer tag to carcass before storage or processing.

History.

Ga. L. 1925, p. 302, § 4; Ga. L. 1931, p. 173, §§ 1-3; Code 1933, § 45-313; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 68; Code 1933, § 45-522, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 946, § 9; repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 1056, § 4/SB 112, effective July 1, 2015.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1056, § 4/SB 112 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 2015.

27-3-47.
[Reserved] Collision with deer by motor vehicle.

History.

Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 20; Code 1933, § 45-525, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 8, effective June 3, 2010.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 8 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective June 3, 2010.

27-3-48.
Hunting deer at night.

Any person who hunts deer at night shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not less than $500.00 and, in the discretion of the sentencing court, imprisonment for not more than 12 months.

If, after July 1, 1978, a person commits and is convicted of two or more violations of hunting deer at night, such person shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $1,500.00 nor more than $5,000.00, and, in the discretion of the sentencing court, by imprisonment for not more than 12 months.

The fines imposed by this Code section shall not be subject to suspension, stay, or probation except that if the court finds that payment of such fine would impose great economic hardship upon the defendant, the court may order such fine paid in installments.

The hunting privileges of a person found guilty of hunting deer at night shall be suspended by the court of jurisdiction for a period of not less than two years.

History.

Ga. L. 1962, p. 671, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 215, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 19; Ga. L. 1973, p. 795, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 41; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1629, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 9; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1782, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2391, § 8.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, “economic” was substituted for “ecomonic” in subsection (c).

27-3-49.
Killing of dogs running deer.

It shall be the duty of every game warden to kill any dog pursuing or killing any deer in any locality other than that prescribed by law or rules and regulations permitting such hunting, and no action for damages shall be maintained against the person for such killing.

It shall be unlawful for any person other than a game warden, sheriff, or deputy sheriff to kill a dog wearing a collar, which dog is or has been pursuing or killing a deer.

It shall not be unlawful for any person to kill a dog which does not have a collar and which is pursuing or killing deer in any locality other than that prescribed by law or rules and regulations permitting such hunting, and no action for damages shall be maintained against the person for such killing.

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 59; Code 1933, § 45-524, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 49; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 7/SB 72.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, substituted “game warden” for “conservation ranger” in subsections (a) and (b).

Cross references.

Hunting deer with dogs generally, §

27-3-17

.

27-3-50.
Sale of antlers, hides, and tails of deer.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title to the contrary, it shall be lawful to sell the antlers, hides, and tails of legally taken deer.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-526, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1.